Maryland, session 2026, HB0593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–302.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Access” means to instruct, communicate with, store data in, retrieve or
intercept data from, or otherwise use the resources of a computer program, computer
system, or computer network.
(3) (i) “Aggregate amount” means a direct loss of property or services
incurred by a victim.
(ii) “Aggregate amount” includes:
1. the value of any money, property, or service lost, stolen, or
rendered unrecoverable by the crime; or
2. any actual reasonable expenditure incurred by the victim
to verify whether a computer program, computer, computer system, or computer network
was altered, acquired, damaged, deleted, disrupted, or destroyed by access in violation of
– 1 –

Ch. 521 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
this section.
(4) (i) “Computer” means an electronic, magnetic, optical, organic, or
other data processing device or system that performs logical, arithmetic, memory, or
storage functions.
(ii) “Computer” includes property, a data storage facility, or a
communications facility that is directly related to or operated with a computer.
(iii) “Computer” does not include an automated typewriter, a
typesetter, or a portable calculator.
(5) “Computer control language” means ordered statements that direct a
computer to perform specific functions.
(6) “Computer database” means a representation of information,
knowledge, facts, concepts, or instructions that:
(i) is intended for use in a computer, computer system, or computer
network; and
(ii) 1. is being prepared or has been prepared in a formalized
manner; or
2. is being produced or has been produced by a computer,
computer system, or computer network.
(7) “Computer network” means the interconnection of one or more
computers through:
(i) the use of a satellite, microwave, line, or other communication
medium; and
(ii) terminals or a complex consisting of two or more interconnected
computers regardless of whether the interconnection is continuously maintained.
(8) “Computer program” means an ordered set of instructions or
statements that may interact with related data and, when executed in a computer system,
causes a computer to perform specified functions.
(9) “Computer services” includes computer time, data processing, and
storage functions.
(10) “Computer software” means a computer program, instruction,
procedure, or associated document regarding the operation of a computer system.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 521
(11) “Computer system” means one or more connected or unconnected
computers, peripheral devices, computer software, data, or computer programs.
(12) “CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE” MEANS SYSTEMS AND ASSETS,
WHETHER PHYSICAL OR VIRTUAL, THAT ARE SO VITAL TO THE STATE, A COUNTY, OR
A MUNICIPALITY THAT THE INCAPACITY OR DESTRUCTION OF ONE OR MORE
COMPONENTS WOULD HAVE A DEBILITATING IMPACT ON:
(I) PUBLIC SECURITY;
(II) ECONOMIC SECURITY;
(III) PUBLIC HEALTH;
(IV) PUBLIC SAFETY;
(V) PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION; OR
(VI) PUBLIC UTILITIES.
(13) “Ransomware” means a computer or data contaminant, encryption, or
lock that:
(i) is placed or introduced without authorization into a computer, a
computer network, or a computer system; and
(ii) restricts access by an authorized person to a computer, computer
data, a computer network, or a computer system in a manner that results in the person
responsible for the placement or introduction of the contaminant, encryption, or lock
demanding payment of money or other consideration to remove the contaminant,
encryption, or lock.
(c) (1) A person may not intentionally, willfully, and without authorization:
(i) access, attempt to access, cause to be accessed, or exceed the
person’s authorized access to all or part of a computer network, computer control language,
computer, computer software, computer system, computer service, or computer database;
or
(ii) copy, attempt to copy, possess, or attempt to possess the contents
of all or part of a computer database accessed in violation of item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) A person may not commit an act prohibited by paragraph (1) of this
subsection with the intent to:
– 3 –

Ch. 521 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) cause the malfunction or interrupt the operation of all or any part
of a computer, computer network, computer control language, computer software, computer
system, computer service, or computer data; or
(ii) alter, damage, or destroy all or any part of data or a computer
program stored, maintained, or produced by a computer, computer network, computer
software, computer system, computer service, or computer database.
(3) A person may not intentionally, willfully, and without authorization:
(i) possess, identify, or attempt to identify a valid access code; or
(ii) publicize or distribute a valid access code to an unauthorized
person.
(4) A person may not commit an act prohibited under this subsection with
the intent to interrupt or impair the functioning of:
(i) the State government;
(ii) a service, device, or system related to the production,
transmission, delivery, or storage of electricity or natural gas in the State that is owned,
operated, or controlled by a person other than a public service company, as defined in §
1–101 of the Public Utilities Article;
(iii) a service provided in the State by a public service company, as
defined in § 1–101 of the Public Utilities Article;
(iv) a health care facility, as defined in § 18–338.1 of the
Health – General Article; or
(v) a public school, as defined in § 1–101 of the Education Article.
(5) (i) This paragraph does not apply to a person who has a bona fide
scientific, educational, governmental, testing, news, or other similar justification for
possessing ransomware.
(ii) A person may not knowingly possess ransomware with the intent
to use the ransomware for the purpose of introduction into the computer, computer
network, or computer system of another person without the authorization of the other
person.
(6) A person may not INTENTIONALLY, WILLFULLY, AND WITHOUT
AUTHORIZATION commit an act prohibited under this subsection with the intent to
interrupt or impair the functioning of CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE OR a public safety
answering point, as defined in § 1–301 of the Public Safety Article.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 521
(7) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY, WILLFULLY, AND WITHOUT
AUTHORIZATION COMMIT AN ACT PROHIBITED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION THAT
DENIES ACCESS TO AN AUTHORIZED USER OF OR INTERRUPTS OR IMPAIRS THE
FUNCTIONING OF CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE OR A PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING
POINT, AS DEFINED IN § 1–301 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(d) (1) A person who violates subsection (c)(1) of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a fine
not exceeding $1,000 or both.
(2) A person who violates subsection (c)(2) or (3) of this section:
(i) if the aggregate amount of the loss is $10,000 or more, is guilty
of a felony and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not
exceeding $10,000 or both; or
(ii) if the aggregate amount of the loss is less than $10,000, is guilty
of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a
fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(3) A person who violates subsection (c)(4) of this section:
(i) if the aggregate amount of the loss is $10,000 or more, is guilty
of a felony and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not
exceeding $100,000 or both; or
(ii) if the aggregate amount of the loss is less than $10,000, is guilty
of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a
fine not exceeding $25,000 or both.
(4) A person who violates subsection (c)(5) of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 2 years or a fine
not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(5) A person who violates subsection (c)(6) of this section is guilty of a felony
and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a fine not exceeding
$25,000 or both.
(6) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C)(7) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $50,000 OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
– 5 –

Ch. 521 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 6 –